District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-3715

Civil liabilities.

Repealed.

Mar. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 9-216, § 16, 40 DCR 37
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837

History

1981 Ed., § 2-2645.

Prior Codifications